Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-1313
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Labor, the Department of Revenue, and the State Racing and Gaming Commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding Debt Act.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 45;

Laws 2025, LB415, § 14.